Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1625
Building; failure to comply with Nebraska Energy Code or equivalent standard; liability.

If the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment or the local code authority finds, within two years from the date a building is first occupied, that the building, at the time of construction, did not comply with the Nebraska Energy Code or equivalent code adopted by a county, city, or village in effect at such time, the director or code authority may order the owner or prime contractor to take those actions necessary to bring the building into compliance. This section does not limit the right of the owner to bring civil action against the contractor, architect, or engineer for the cost of bringing the building into compliance.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 49;

Laws 1983, LB 124, § 23;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 15;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 166;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 455.